Utah statutes.
16-16-1401.   Governing law.

(1)  The law of the state or other jurisdiction under which a foreign cooperative is organized governs relations among the members of the foreign cooperative and between the members and the foreign cooperative.

(2)  A foreign cooperative may not be denied a certificate of authority because of any difference between the law of the jurisdiction under which the foreign cooperative is organized and the law of this state.

(3)  A certificate of authority does not authorize a foreign cooperative to engage in any activity or exercise any power that a limited cooperative association may not engage in or exercise in this state.

